Illinois, session 104th, HB4717.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Personalized Algorithmic Pricing Disclosure Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. As used in this Act:7    "Algorithm" means a computational automated process that 8uses a set of rules to define a sequence of operations.9    "Clear and conspicuous disclosure" means disclosure in the 10same medium as, and provided on, at, or near and 11contemporaneous with every advertisement, display, image, 12offer, or announcement of a price for which notice is 13required, using lettering and wording that is easily visible 14and understandable to the average consumer.15    "Consumer" means a natural person in this State who is 16seeking or solicited to purchase, lease, or receive goods or 17services for personal, family, or household use.18    "Dynamic pricing" means pricing that fluctuates dependent 19on conditions. 20    "Entity" means any natural person, firm, organization, 21partnership, association, corporation, or any other entity 22domiciled or doing business in this State.23    "Personal data" means any data that identifies or could   HB4717- 2 -LRB104 18478 SPS 31920 b1reasonably be linked, directly or indirectly, with a specific 2consumer or device. "Personal data" does not include location 3data that is used by a for-hire vehicle, as determined by local 4ordinance, or a transportation network company, as defined in 5Section 5 of the Transportation Network Providers Act, solely 6to calculate the fare based on mileage and trip duration 7between the passenger's pickup and drop-off locations.8    "Personalized algorithmic pricing" means dynamic pricing 9set by an algorithm that uses personal data. 10    Section 10. Disclosure requirement. An entity that sets 11the price of goods or services using personalized algorithmic 12pricing, and that directly or indirectly advertises, promotes, 13labels, or publishes a statement, display, image, offer, or 14announcement of personalized algorithmic pricing to a 15consumer, using personal data specific to the consumer, shall 16include with the statement, display, image, offer, or 17announcement a clear and conspicuous disclosure that states: 18"THIS PRICE WAS SET BY AN ALGORITHM USING YOUR PERSONAL DATA". 19    Section 15. Exceptions. Nothing in this Act applies to:20        (1) a person, firm, partnership, association, or 21    corporation, or agent or employee thereof, subject to the 22    Illinois Insurance Code;23        (2) a financial institution or affiliate of a 24    financial institution, as those terms are defined in 15   HB4717- 3 -LRB104 18478 SPS 31920 b1    U.S.C. 6809, to the extent that the financial institution 2    or affiliate of a financial institution is subject to 3    Title V of the Gramm-Leach-Bliley Act (15 U.S.C. 6801, et 4    seq., as amended) and its implementing regulations;5        (3) a financial institution, as that term is defined 6    in Section 2 of the Illinois Banking Act; or7        (4) a price that is offered to a consumer who has an 8    existing subscription-based agreement or contract for 9    goods or services with an entity if the price is less than 10    the price for the same goods or services set forth in the 11    subscription-based agreement or contract. 12    Section 20. Enforcement. A violation of this Act 13constitutes an unlawful practice under the Consumer Fraud and 14Deceptive Business Practices Act. All remedies, penalties, and 15authority granted to the Attorney General by the Consumer 16Fraud and Deceptive Business Practices Act shall be available 17to the Attorney General for the enforcement of this Act. 18    Section 90. The Consumer Fraud and Deceptive Business 19Practices Act is amended by adding Section 2MMMM as follows: 20    (815 ILCS 505/2MMMM new)21    Sec. 2MMMM. Violations of the Personalized Algorithmic 22Pricing Disclosure Act. Any person who violates the 23Personalized Algorithmic Pricing Disclosure Act commits an   HB4717- 4 -LRB104 18478 SPS 31920 b1unlawful practice within the meaning of this Act. 2    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 3becoming law.